Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Management of Institutional Funds

273.510.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

273.520.
Appropriation of net appreciation. [Repealed.]

273.530.
Rule of construction. [Repealed.]

273.540.
Investment authority. [Repealed.]

273.550.
Delegation of investment authority. [Repealed.]

273.560.
Standard of conduct. [Repealed.]

273.570.
Release of restrictions on use or investment. [Repealed.]

273.580.
Uniformity of application and construction. [Repealed.]

273.590.
Short title. [Repealed.]